Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4503
Long-term care insurance; applicability of acts.

The Long-Term Care Insurance Act shall apply to policies delivered or issued for delivery in this state on or after May 30, 1987, and shall not supersede the obligations of entities subject to the act to comply with the provisions of Chapter 44 insofar as such provisions do not conflict with the Long-Term Care Insurance Act, except that the Medicare Supplement Insurance Minimum Standards Act shall not apply to long-term care insurance. Any product advertised, marketed, or offered as long-term care insurance shall be subject to the Long-Term Care Insurance Act.

Laws 1987, LB 416, § 3;

Laws 1988, LB 998, § 13;

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 45.

Medicare Supplement Insurance Minimum Standards Act, see section 44-3601.